Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2945
Member interest.

A member's interest:

(1) Consists of: (a) Governance rights; (b) financial rights; and (c) the right or obligation, if any, to do business with the limited cooperative association;

(2) Is personal property; and

(3) May be in certificated or uncertificated form.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 45;

Laws 2008, LB848, § 9.